Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.904

Effective dates—1983 c 161.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately.

(2) Section 10 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 1984.

[ 1983 c 161 s 32.]